District of Columbia statutes.
31-3803

Notification of birth and payment of premiums or fees.

If payment of a specific premium or subscription fee is required to provide coverage for a child, the policy or contract may require that notification of birth of a newly born child and payment of the required premium or fees must be furnished to the insurer or nonprofit service or indemnity corporation within 31 days after the date of birth in order to have the coverage continue beyond such 31-day period.

Oct. 20, 1979, D.C. Law 3-33, § 4, 26 DCR 1116
1981 Ed., § 35-1103.
1973 Ed., § 35-2003.